Utah statutes.
59-2-919.   Notice, public hearing, and resolution requirements for certain
tax increases -- Exceptions -- Applicability of provisions.
(1)  As used in this section:
(a)  "Ad valorem tax revenue" means ad valorem property tax revenue not
including revenue from new growth as defined in Section 59-2-924.
(b)  "Calendar year taxing entity" means a taxing entity that operates under a
fiscal year that begins on January 1 and ends on December 31.
(c)  "Fiscal year taxing entity" means a taxing entity that operates under a
fiscal year that begins on July 1 and ends on June 30.
(2)  A taxing entity may not levy a tax rate that exceeds the taxing entity's
certified tax rate unless the taxing entity:
(a)  to the extent required by this section, meets the:
(i)  notice requirements of this section; and
(ii)  public hearing requirements of this section; and
(b)  adopts a resolution in accordance with this section.
(3) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), a calendar year taxing entity
may levy a tax rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified
tax rate if the calendar year taxing entity:
(i) (A)  provides notice by meeting the advertisement requirements of
Subsections (6) and (7) before the calendar year taxing entity conducts the
public hearing at which the calendar year taxing entity's annual budget is
adopted; and
(B)  before the calendar year taxing entity levies a tax rate that exceeds the
calendar year taxing entity's certified tax rate:
(I)  provides notice by meeting the advertisement requirements of Subsections
(6) and (7); or
(II)  provides a notice by mail:
(Aa)  on or no earlier than 14 days before the date the treasurer furnishes
the notice required by Section 59-2-1317 for the calendar year immediately
preceding the calendar year for which the calendar year taxing entity seeks to
levy a tax rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax
rate;
(Bb)  before the calendar year taxing entity conducts the public meeting at
which the calendar year taxing entity's annual budget is adopted; and
(Cc)  as provided in Subsection (3)(b); and
(ii)  conducts a public hearing in accordance with Subsections (8) and (9):
(A)  on or before the calendar year taxing entity conducts the public meeting
at which the calendar year taxing entity's annual budget is adopted; and
(B)  if the calendar year taxing entity provides the notice described in
Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(I), before the calendar year taxing entity levies a
tax rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax rate.
(b)  For a calendar year taxing entity that provides the notice described in
Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(II), the notice:
(i)  shall be mailed to each owner of property:
(A)  within the calendar year taxing entity; and
(B)  listed on the assessment roll;
(ii)  shall be printed on a form:
(A)  developed by the commission; and
(B)  that, as determined by the commission, may be combined with:
(I)  a notice described in Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(II) provided by one or more
other calendar year taxing entities; or
(II)  the notice required by Section 59-2-1317;
(iii)  shall contain for each property described in Subsection (3)(b)(i):
(A)  the value of the property for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year for which the calendar year taxing entity seeks to levy a tax
rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax rate;
(B)  the tax on the property for the calendar year immediately preceding the
calendar year for which the calendar year taxing entity seeks to levy a tax
rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax rate; and
(C)  the estimated tax on the property:
(I)  for the calendar year for which the calendar year taxing entity seeks to
levy a tax rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax
rate; and
(II)  calculated on the basis of data for the calendar year immediately
preceding the calendar year for which the calendar year taxing entity seeks to
levy a tax rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax
rate;
(iv)  shall contain the following statement:
"[Insert name of taxing entity] is proposing a tax increase for [insert
applicable calendar year].  This notice contains estimates of the tax on your
property and the proposed tax increase on your property as a result of this
tax increase.  These estimates are calculated on the basis of [insert previous
applicable calendar year] data.  The actual tax on your property and proposed
tax increase on your property may vary from this estimate.";
(v)  shall state the date, time, and place of the public hearing that will be
held to discuss the calendar year taxing entity's annual budget; and
(vi)  may contain other property tax information approved by the commission.
(4)  Except as provided in Subsection (5), a fiscal year taxing entity may
levy a tax rate that exceeds the fiscal year taxing entity's certified tax
rate if the fiscal year taxing entity:
(a)  provides notice by meeting the advertisement requirements of Subsections
(6) and (7) before the fiscal year taxing entity conducts the public meeting
at which the fiscal year taxing entity's annual budget is adopted; and
(b)  conducts a public hearing in accordance with Subsections (8) and (9)
before the fiscal year taxing entity's annual budget is adopted.
(5) (a)  A taxing entity is not required to meet the notice or public hearing
requirements of Subsection (3) or (4) if the taxing entity is expressly
exempted by law from complying with the requirements of this section.
(b) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (5)(b)(ii), a taxing entity is not
required to meet the notice or public hearing requirements of Subsection (3)
or (4) if:
(A)  the taxing entity is a party to an interlocal agreement under Title 11,
Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act, that creates an interlocal entity to
provide fire protection, emergency, and emergency medical services;
(B)  the tax rate increase is approved by the taxing entity's voters at an
election held for that purpose on or before December 31, 2010;
(C)  the purpose of the tax rate increase is to pay for fire protection,
emergency, and emergency medical services provided by the interlocal entity;
and
(D)  at least 30 days before the taxing entity's annual budget hearing, the
taxing entity:
(I)  adopts a resolution certifying that:
(Aa)  the taxing entity will dedicate all revenue from the tax rate increase
exclusively to pay for fire protection, emergency, and emergency medical
services provided by the interlocal entity; and
(Bb)  the amount of other revenues, independent of the revenue generated from
the tax rate increase, that the taxing entity spends for fire protection,
emergency, and emergency medical services each year after the tax rate
increase will not decrease below the amount spent by the taxing entity during
the year immediately before the tax rate increase without a corresponding
decrease in the taxing entity's property tax revenues used in calculating the
taxing entity's certified tax rate; and
(II)  sends a copy of the resolution to the commission.
(ii)  The exception under Subsection (5)(b)(i) from the notice and public
hearing requirements of Subsection (3) or (4) does not apply to an increase in
a taxing entity's tax rate that occurs after December 31, 2010, even if the
tax rate increase is approved by the taxing entity's voters before that date.
(c)  A taxing entity is not required to meet the notice requirements of
Subsection (3) or (4) if:
(i)  Section 53A-17a-133 allows the taxing entity to levy a tax rate that
exceeds that certified tax rate without having to comply with the notice
provisions of this section; or
(ii)  the taxing entity:
(A)  budgeted less than $20,000 in ad valorem tax revenues for the previous
fiscal year; and
(B)  sets a budget during the current fiscal year of less than $20,000 of ad
valorem tax revenues.
(6) (a)  Subject to Subsections (6)(d) and (7)(b), the advertisement described
in this section shall be published:
(i)  subject to Section 45-1-101, in a newspaper or combination of newspapers
of general circulation in the taxing entity;
(ii)  electronically in accordance with Section 45-1-101; and
(iii)  on the Utah Public Notice Website created in Section 63F-1-701.
(b)  The advertisement described in Subsection (6)(a)(i) shall:
(i)  be no less than 1/4 page in size;
(ii)  use type no smaller than 18 point; and
(iii)  be surrounded by a 1/4-inch border.
(c)  The advertisement described in Subsection (6)(a)(i) may not be placed in
that portion of the newspaper where legal notices and classified
advertisements appear.
(d)  It is the intent of the Legislature that:
(i)  whenever possible, the advertisement described in Subsection (6)(a)(i)
appear in a newspaper that is published at least one day per week; and
(ii)  the newspaper or combination of newspapers selected:
(A)  be of general interest and readership in the taxing entity; and
(B)  not be of limited subject matter.
(e) (i)  The advertisement:
(A)  described in Subsection (6)(a)(i) shall:
(I)  except as provided in Subsection (6)(e)(ii), be run once each week for
the two weeks:
(Aa)  before a taxing entity conducts a public hearing at which the taxing
entity's annual budget is discussed; and
(Bb)  if a calendar year taxing entity provides the notice described in
Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(I), before the calendar year taxing entity levies a
tax rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax rate;
and
(II)  state that the taxing entity will meet on a certain day, time, and place
fixed in the advertisement, which shall be not less than seven days after the
day the first advertisement is published, for the purpose of hearing comments
regarding any proposed increase and to explain the reasons for the proposed
increase; or
(B)  described in Subsection (6)(a)(ii) shall:
(I)  be published two weeks:
(Aa)  before a taxing entity conducts a public hearing at which the taxing
entity's annual budget is discussed; and
(Bb)  if a calendar year taxing entity provides the notice described in
Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(I), before the calendar year taxing entity levies a
tax rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax rate;
and
(II)  state that the taxing entity will meet on a certain day, time, and place
fixed in the advertisement, which shall be not less than seven days after the
day the first advertisement is published, for the purpose of hearing comments
regarding any proposed increase and to explain the reasons for the proposed
increase.
(ii)  If a taxing entity's public hearing information is published by the
county auditor in accordance with Section 59-2-919.2, the taxing entity is not
subject to the requirement to run the advertisement twice, as required by
Subsection (6)(e)(i)(A), but shall run the advertisement once during the week:
(A)  before the taxing entity conducts a public hearing at which the taxing
entity's annual budget is discussed; and
(B)  if a calendar year taxing entity provides the notice described in
Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(I), before the calendar year taxing entity levies a
tax rate that exceeds the calendar year taxing entity's certified tax rate.
(f) (i)  For purposes of Subsection (3)(a)(i)(A) or (4)(a), the form and
content of an advertisement shall be substantially as follows:
"NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE
(NAME OF TAXING ENTITY)
The (name of the taxing entity) is proposing to increase its property tax
revenue.
●     The (name of the taxing entity) tax on a (insert the average value of
a residence in the taxing entity rounded to the nearest thousand dollars)
residence would increase from $______ to $________, which is $_______ per
year.
●     The (name of the taxing entity) tax on a (insert the value of a
business having the same value as the average value of a residence in the
taxing entity) business would increase from $________ to $_______, which is
$______ per year.
●     If the proposed budget is approved, (name of the taxing entity) would
increase its property tax budgeted revenue by ___% above last year's property
tax budgeted revenue excluding new growth.
All concerned citizens are invited to a public hearing on the tax increase.
PUBLIC HEARING
Date/Time:      (date) (time)
Location:       (name of meeting place and address of meeting place)
To obtain more information regarding the tax increase, citizens may contact
the (name of the taxing entity) at (phone number of taxing entity)."
(ii)  For purposes of Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(I), the form and content of an
advertisement shall be substantially as follows:
"NOTICE OF PROPOSED TAX INCREASE
(NAME OF TAXING ENTITY)
The (name of the taxing entity) is proposing to increase its property tax
revenue.
●     The (name of the taxing entity) tax on a (insert the average value of
a residence in the taxing entity rounded to the nearest thousand dollars)
residence would increase from $______ to $________, which is $_______ per
year.
●     The (name of the taxing entity) tax on a (insert the value of a
business having the same value as the average value of a residence in the
taxing entity) business would increase from $________ to $_______, which is
$______ per year.
●     If the proposed budget is approved, (name of the taxing entity) would
increase its property tax budgeted revenue by ___% above last year's property
tax budgeted revenue excluding new growth.
(Name of taxing entity) property tax revenue from new growth and other sources
will increase from $_______________ to $______________.
All concerned citizens are invited to a public hearing on the tax increase.
PUBLIC HEARING
Date/Time:      (date) (time)
Location:       (name of meeting place and address of meeting place)
To obtain more information regarding the tax increase, citizens may contact
the (name of the taxing entity) at (phone number of taxing entity)."
(7)  The commission:
(a)  shall adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, governing the joint use of one advertisement
described in Subsection (6) by two or more taxing entities; and
(b)  subject to Section 45-1-101, may authorize:
(i)  the use of a weekly newspaper:
(A)  in a county having both daily and weekly newspapers if the weekly
newspaper would provide equal or greater notice to the taxpayer; and
(B)  if the county petitions the commission for the use of the weekly
newspaper; or
(ii)  the use by a taxing entity except for a calendar year taxing entity that
provides the notice described in Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(II) of a commission
approved direct notice to each taxpayer if:
(A)  the cost of the advertisement would cause undue hardship;
(B)  the direct notice is different and separate from that provided for in
Section 59-2-919.1; and
(C)  the taxing entity petitions the commission for the use of a commission
approved direct notice.
(8) (a) (i)  A taxing entity shall on or before March 1 notify the county
legislative body in which the taxing entity is located of the date, time, and
place of the first public hearing at which the taxing entity's annual budget
will be discussed.
(ii)  A county that receives notice from a taxing entity under Subsection
(8)(a)(i) shall include on the notice required by Section 59-2-919.1 the date,
time, and place of the public hearing described in Subsection (8)(a)(i).
(b) (i)  A public hearing described in this section shall be open to the
public.
(ii)  The governing body of a taxing entity conducting a public hearing
described in this section shall provide an interested party desiring to be
heard an opportunity to present oral testimony within reasonable time limits.
(c) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (8)(c)(ii), a taxing entity may not
schedule a public hearing described in this section at the same time as the
public hearing of another overlapping taxing entity in the same county.
(ii)  The taxing entities in which the power to set tax levies is vested in
the same governing board or authority may consolidate the public hearings
described in this section into one public hearing.
(d)  A county legislative body shall resolve any conflict in public hearing
dates and times after consultation with each affected taxing entity.
(e)  A taxing entity shall hold a public hearing described in this section
beginning at or after 6 p.m.
(9) (a)  If a taxing entity does not make a final decision on budgeting an
increased amount of ad valorem tax revenue at a public hearing described in
this section, the taxing entity shall announce at that public hearing the
scheduled time and place of the next public meeting at which the taxing entity
will consider budgeting the increased amount of ad valorem tax revenue.
(b) (i)  If a calendar year taxing entity that conducts a public hearing in
accordance with Subsection (3)(b)(ii) does not adopt a resolution levying a
tax rate on the day of the public hearing, the taxing entity shall announce at
that public hearing the scheduled time and place of the next public meeting at
which the taxing entity will consider adopting a resolution levying the tax
rate.
(ii)  If a taxing entity except for a taxing entity described in Subsection
(5)(a) or (b) will consider adopting a resolution levying a tax rate at a day
and time that is more than two weeks after the public hearing described in
Subsection 59-2-919.1(2)(c)(v), the taxing entity shall meet the notice
requirements of Subsection (3)(a)(i)(B)(I).
(10) (a)  A taxing entity may adopt a resolution levying a tax rate that
exceeds the taxing entity's certified tax rate if the taxing entity, to the
extent required by this section, meets the:
(i)  notice requirements of this section; and
(ii)  public hearing requirements of this section.
(b)  A public hearing on levying a tax rate that exceeds a taxing entity's
certified tax rate may coincide with a public hearing on the taxing entity's
proposed annual budget.
(11)  The amendments to this section in Laws of Utah 2009, Chapter 204, apply
to:
(a)  for a fiscal year taxing entity, the fiscal year that begins on July 1,
2009; or
(b)  for a calendar year taxing entity, the fiscal year that begins on January
1, 2010.
